Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB660.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6096YC (1) 91 ss/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 64.3, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 1 by striking the subsection. 2 EXPLANATION 3 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 4 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 5 Under current law, certain public officers are required to 6 obtain a bond that runs to the state for the use and benefit 7 of any corporation, public or private, or person injured or 8 sustaining loss, with a right of action in the name of the 9 state for its or the corporationâs or personâs use (Code 10 section 64.18). In 2024, the general assembly enacted a 11 provision allowing public officers to obtain an insurance 12 policy in lieu of such a bond. The state is required to be the 13 beneficiary of the insurance policy and the policy is required 14 to be for the use and benefit of any corporation, public or 15 private, or person injured or sustaining loss, with a right of 16 action in the name of the state for its or the corporationâs 17 or personâs use (Code section 64.3(4)). This bill strikes 18 these requirements for an insurance policy obtained in lieu of 19 a bond. 20 -1- LSB 6096YC (1) 91 ss/ns 1/ 1